New York, session 2025-2026, A4295.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 41 of the public officers law, as amended by chap- 2 ter 91 of the laws of 1928, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 41. Vacancies filled by legislature. When a vacancy occurs or 4 exists[, other than by removal,] in the office of comptroller or attor- 5 ney-general, or a resignation of either such officer to take effect at 6 any future day shall have been made while the legislature is in session, 7 the two houses thereof, by [joint ballot] a two-thirds vote in each 8 house, shall appoint a person to fill such actual or prospective vacan- 9 cy. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08289-01-5